Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
Article 2 Administration and Management of the Assets of the Fund

47-7-20.
Membership of the board; manner of election; compensation and expenses.

To carry out this chapter, there is created the Board of Trustees of the Georgia Firefighters’ Pension Fund. The board shall consist of five members as follows:

The Governor or the Governor’s designee;

The Commissioner of Insurance or the Commissioner of Insurance’s designee;

Two active members of the fund appointed by the Governor; and

One retired member of the fund appointed by the Governor.

The first members appointed by the Governor pursuant to paragraphs (3) and (4) of subsection (a) of this Code section shall be appointed to take office on July 1, 1984. One of the persons appointed pursuant to paragraph (3) of subsection (a) of this Code section and the person appointed pursuant to paragraph (4) of subsection (a) of this Code section shall each be appointed for an initial term of two years. The remaining person appointed pursuant to paragraph (3) of subsection (a) of this Code section shall be appointed for an initial term of four years. Thereafter, successors shall be appointed by the Governor to take office upon the expiration of the respective terms of office for terms of four years. All such members shall serve until their successors are appointed and qualified. In the event of a vacancy during the term of office of any such member, the Governor shall appoint a qualified person to fill such vacancy for the unexpired term.

The Georgia State Firefighters’ Association shall be authorized to submit to the Governor the names of nominees for each position on the board appointed by the Governor pursuant to subsection (b) of this Code section. The Governor, in making such appointments, may consider the nominees submitted by said association, but all such appointments shall be at the sole discretion of the Governor, and the Governor shall not be required to appoint members of the board from such nominees.

Members of the board shall serve without pay but all members of the board shall be reimbursed for all necessary expenses that they may incur through service on the board.

History.

Ga. L. 1955, p. 339, § 2; Ga. L. 1984, p. 828, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 477, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 332, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1376, § 1; Ga. L. 2015, p. 898, § 6/HB 266.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, substituted “retired member” for “retired beneficiary” in paragraph (a)(4).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1984, p. 828, § 2, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “The positions of membership on the Board of Trustees of the Georgia Firemen’s Pension Fund existing on June 30, 1984, except for the Governor and Insurance Commissioner, shall stand abolished on July 1, 1984.”

Ga. L. 1984, p. 828, § 3, provided that that Act, which amended this Code section, shall become effective July 1, 1984, except that it shall become effective upon the date of the Governor’s approval (March 28, 1984) for the administrative purpose of allowing the Governor to consider appointments pursuant to the revised language of §

47-7-20

.

47-7-21.
Creation of the office of executive director of the board; appointment of the executive director; compensation; bond.

There is created the office of executive director of the Georgia Firefighters’ Pension Fund. The executive director shall be named by the board and shall serve at the pleasure of the board. The compensation of the executive director shall be fixed by the board. He or she shall be bonded by a corporate surety in such amount as the board shall determine to be sufficient. The cost of such bond shall be paid by the fund.

History.

Ga. L. 1955, p. 339, § 3; Ga. L. 1956, p. 368, § 3; Ga. L. 1962, p. 550, § 3; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1376, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 54, § 1/HB 355.

47-7-22.
Legal adviser to the board.

The Attorney General shall act as legal adviser to the board.

History.

Ga. L. 1955, p. 339, § 9; Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 65/SB 436.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, substituted “adviser” for “advisor” near the end.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The intent of this Act is to repeal obsolete and inoperative provisions and to make certain stylistic corrections in Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated. Nothing in this Act shall deny, abridge, increase, renew, revive, or on any way affect any right, benefit, option, credit, or election to which any person was entitled pursuant to such title on June 30, 2010, and the board of trustees of each public retirement system is authorized and directed to provide by regulation for the continuation of any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election not otherwise covered in this Act; provided, however, that any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election shall be subject to the statutory provisions in effect on June 30, 2010.”

47-7-23.
Powers and duties of the board generally.

The board shall have the following powers and duties:

To provide for the payment of administrative expenses;

To rule upon all applications for pensions;

To provide for the payment of pensions;

To provide for the collection of all revenue under this chapter;

To make all necessary rules and regulations not inconsistent with the laws of this state for the governing of this retirement fund;

To prescribe rules and regulations of eligibility of persons to receive pensions under this chapter;

To expend funds in accordance with this chapter; and

To exercise all other powers necessary for the administration of the fund.

The board shall have the full power to invest and reinvest such funds subject to all the terms, conditions, limitations, and restrictions imposed by Article 7 of Chapter 20 of this title, the “Public Retirement Systems Investment Authority Law.” Subject to such terms, conditions, limitations, and restrictions, the board shall have full power to hold, purchase, sell, assign, transfer, and dispose of any of the securities and investments in which any of the funds are invested, including the proceeds of any investments and money belonging to the fund.

The board is authorized to employ agents, including, but not limited to, banks or trust departments thereof, and to contract for the services of such agents as investment advisers and counselors, in making recommendations for investments, and in making investments, if the board so authorizes.

The board of trustees may invest, in certified or uncertified form, in securities of any open-end management type investment company or investment trust registered with the Federal Securities and Exchange Commission under the Investment Company Act of 1940, as now or hereafter amended, if such investment company or investment trust has been organized for not less than ten years or has assets of not less than $200 million at the date of investment; provided, however, that the board shall not be authorized to pay any such investment company or investment trust a management fee in excess of 0.05 percent of the funds invested.

History.

Ga. L. 1955, p. 339, § 4; Ga. L. 1963, p. 266, § 1; Ga. L. 1976, p. 241, § 3; Ga. L. 1997, p. 966, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 2, § 8; Ga. L. 2001, p. 899, § 1; Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 65/SB 436.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, substituted “advisers” for “advisors” in the middle of subsection (c).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The intent of this Act is to repeal obsolete and inoperative provisions and to make certain stylistic corrections in Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated. Nothing in this Act shall deny, abridge, increase, renew, revive, or on any way affect any right, benefit, option, credit, or election to which any person was entitled pursuant to such title on June 30, 2010, and the board of trustees of each public retirement system is authorized and directed to provide by regulation for the continuation of any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election not otherwise covered in this Act; provided, however, that any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election shall be subject to the statutory provisions in effect on June 30, 2010.”

U.S. Code.

The Investment Company Act of 1940, referred to in subsection (d) of this Code section, is codified as

15 U.S.C. § 80

a-1 et seq.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Rules of General Applicability, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Fireman’s Pension Fund, Chapter 513-7-1.

47-7-24.
Power of the board to accept and use any gift, grant, or bequest.

The board may take or receive any gift, grant, or bequest of money, real or personal property, or anything of value and use the same for the purposes set forth in this chapter.

History.

Ga. L. 1955, p. 339, § 13.

47-7-25.
Annual audit of the fund.

The state auditor is directed to make an annual audit of the fund.

History.

Ga. L. 1955, p. 339, § 9.

47-7-26.
Power of board to determine eligibility for membership or retirement of any volunteer firefighter unable to attend the prescribed number of drills, meetings, and fires.

Notwithstanding any provision in this chapter to the contrary, the board is authorized to determine the eligibility for membership in and retirement under the fund of any volunteer firefighter who, for cause beyond his control, is or was unable to attend, during any calendar year, the annual percentage of all drills, meetings, and fires prescribed by the board pursuant to Code Section 47-7-81.

History.

Ga. L. 1961, p. 417, § 3; Ga. L. 1974, p. 377, § 2; Ga. L. 1991, p. 755, § 3; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1376, § 1.

47-7-27.
Power of board to grant retirement benefit increases.

Subject to the terms and limitations of this Code section, the board of trustees is authorized to adopt from time to time a method or methods of providing for increases in the maximum monthly retirement benefit payable under Code Section 47-7-100 or 47-7-102, or both, for persons theretofore or thereafter retiring under such Code sections. Such method shall be based upon:

The recommendation of the actuary of the board of trustees;

The maintenance of the actuarial soundness of the fund in accordance with the standards provided in Code Section 47-20-10 or such higher standards as may be adopted by the board; and

Such other factors as the board deems relevant.

Any such increase may be uniform or may vary in accordance with the time of retirement, length of service, age, nature of the retirement, or such other factors as the board of trustees shall determine.

No increase granted pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section shall become effective prior to July 1, 1993. Any such increase which becomes effective on July 1, 1993, shall not exceed 3 percent of the maximum monthly retirement benefit then in effect. Thereafter, such increases may be authorized effective as of January 1 and July 1 of each year; provided, however, that no such increase shall exceed 1 1/2 percent of the maximum monthly retirement benefit then in effect.

No increase shall be made pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section to become effective within six months of the effective date of any increase in the maximum retirement benefit granted by the General Assembly through amendment of Code Section 47-7-100.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-7-27

, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 1047, § 1.